Hawaii statutes.
[§551E-1] Definitions. For the
purposes of this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

"Agent" means a person granted
authority to act for a principal under a power of attorney, whether denominated
an agent, attorney-in-fact, or otherwise. The term includes an original agent,
co-agent, successor agent, and a person to which an agent's authority is
delegated.

"Durable" means not terminated by the
principal's incapacity, with respect to a power of attorney.

"Electronic" means relating to
technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

"Good faith" means honesty in fact.

"Incapacitated" or
"incapacity" means the inability of an individual to manage property
or business affairs because the individual:

(1) Has an impairment in the ability to receive and
evaluate information or make or communicate decisions even with the use of
technological assistance; or

(2) Is:

(A) Missing;

(B) Detained, including incarcerated in a penal
system; or

(C) Outside of the United States and unable
to return.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial
entity.

"Power of attorney" means a writing
or other record that grants authority to an agent to act in the place of the
principal, whether or not the term "power of attorney" is used.

"Presently exercisable general power of
appointment" means the power exercisable at the time in question to vest
absolute ownership in the principal individually, the principal's estate, the
principal's creditors, or the creditors of the principal's estate, with respect
to property or a property interest subject to a power of appointment. The term
includes a power of appointment not exercisable until the occurrence of a
specified event, the satisfaction of an ascertainable standard, or the passage
of a specified period only after the occurrence of the specified event, the
satisfaction of the ascertainable standard, or the passage of the specified
period. The term does not include a power exercisable in a fiduciary capacity
or only by will.

"Principal" means an individual who
grants authority to an agent in a power of attorney.

"Property" means anything that may be
the subject of ownership, whether real or personal, or legal or equitable, or
any interest or right therein.

"Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Sign" means, with present intent to
authenticate or adopt a record, to:

(1) Execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

(2) Attach to or logically associate with the record
an electronic sound, symbol, or process.

"State" means a state of the United
States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of
the United States.

"Stocks and bonds" means stocks,
bonds, mutual funds, and all other types of securities and financial
instruments, whether held directly, indirectly, or in any other manner. The
term does not include commodity futures contracts and call or put options on
stocks or stock indexes. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next